Utah statutes.
78A-6-601.   Criminal proceedings involving minors -- Transfer to juvenile court -- Exception.

(1)  If, during the pendency of a criminal or quasi-criminal proceeding in another court, including a preliminary hearing, it is determined that the person charged is under 21 years of age and was less than 18 years of age at the time of committing the alleged offense, that court shall transfer the case to the juvenile court, together with all the papers, documents, and transcripts of any testimony except as provided in Sections 78A-6-701, 78A-6-702, and 78A-6-703.

(2)  The court making the transfer shall order the person to be taken immediately to the juvenile court or to a place of detention designated by the juvenile court, or shall release him to the custody of his parent or guardian or other person legally responsible for him, to be brought before the juvenile court at a time designated by it.  The juvenile court shall then proceed as provided in this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 38, 2010 General Session

